Hawaii statutes.
§804-7.2 Violations of conditions of
release on bail, recognizance, or supervised release. (a) Upon verified
application by the prosecuting attorney alleging that a defendant has
intentionally violated the conditions of release on bail, recognizance, or
supervised release, the judicial officer named in section 804-5 shall issue a
warrant directing the defendant be arrested and taken forthwith before the
court of record for hearing.

(b) Upon verified application by a pretrial
officer of the intake service center that a defendant has intentionally
violated the conditions of release on bail, recognizance, or supervised
release, the court may issue an order pertaining to bail to secure the
defendant's appearance before the court or a warrant directing that the
defendant be arrested and taken forthwith before the court of record for
hearing.

(c) A law enforcement officer having reasonable
grounds to believe that a released felony defendant has violated the conditions
of release on bail, recognizance, or supervised release, may, where it would be
impracticable to secure a warrant, arrest the defendant and take the defendant
forthwith before the court of record. [L 1978, c 217, pt of §1; am L 1987, c
139, §2; am L 2016, c 231, §63]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next